Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-1502
Additional authority granted.

Section 19-1501 shall be construed as granting additional authority and not as repealing any existing statutory authority.

Laws 1943, c. 40, § 2, p. 185;

R.S.1943, § 19-1502;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 120.
September 1, 2019